District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-207

Course of performance or practical construction.

Repealed.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 4(b), 60 DCR 2634

Uniform Statutory Source:Sections 2-208 and 1-205(4).

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology, except that subsection (2) was further revised to make the subsection parallel the provisions of Section 1-205(4) by adding that course of dealing controls usage of trade.

Purposes: The section should be read in conjunction with Section 2A-208. In particular, although a specific term may control over course of performance as a matter of lease construction under subsection (2), subsection (3) allows the same course of dealing to show a waiver or modification, if Section 2A-208 is satisfied.

Cross References:Sections 1-205(4), 2-208 and 2A-208.

Definitional Cross References: “Course of dealing”. Section 1-205.

“Knowledge”. Section 1-201(25).

“Lease agreement”. Section 2A-103(1)(k).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Party”. Section 1-201(29).

“Term”. Section 1-201(42).

“Usage of trade”. Section 1-205.

For present law, see § 28:1-303.
1981 Ed., § 28:2A-207.